Utah statutes.
76-6-703 (Superseded 11/01/10).   Computer crimes and penalties.
(1)  A person who without authorization gains or attempts to gain access to
and alters, damages, destroys, discloses, or modifies any computer, computer
network, computer property, computer system, computer program, computer data
or software, and thereby causes damage to another, or obtains money, property,
information, or a benefit for any person without legal right, is guilty of:
(a)  a class B misdemeanor when:
(i)  the damage caused or the value of the money, property, or benefit
obtained or sought to be obtained is less than $300; or
(ii)  the information obtained is not confidential;
(b)  a class A misdemeanor when the damage caused or the value of the money,
property, or benefit obtained or sought to be obtained is or exceeds $300 but
is less than $1,000;
(c)  a third degree felony when the damage caused or the value of the money,
property, or benefit obtained or sought to be obtained is or exceeds $1,000
but is less than $5,000;
(d)  a second degree felony when the damage caused or the value of the money,
property, or benefit obtained or sought to be obtained is or exceeds $5,000;
or
(e)  a third degree felony when:
(i)  the property or benefit obtained or sought to be obtained is a license or
entitlement;
(ii)  the damage is to the license or entitlement of another person; or
(iii)  the information obtained is confidential; or
(iv)  in gaining access the person breaches or breaks through a security
system.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a person who intentionally
or knowingly and without authorization gains or attempts to gain access to a
computer, computer network, computer property, or computer system under
circumstances not otherwise constituting an offense under this section is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), a retailer that uses an electronic
product identification or tracking system, or other technology to identify,
track, or price goods is not guilty of a violation of Subsection (2)(a) if the
equipment designed to read the electronic product identification or tracking
system data and used by the retailer to identify, track, or price goods is
located within the retailer's location.
(3)  A person who uses or knowingly allows another person to use any computer,
computer network, computer property, or computer system, program, or software
to devise or execute any artifice or scheme to defraud or to obtain money,
property, services, or other things of value by false pretenses, promises, or
representations, is guilty of an offense based on the value of the money,
property, services, or things of value, in the degree set forth in Subsection
76-10-1801(1).
(4)  A person who intentionally or knowingly and without authorization,
interferes with or interrupts computer services to another authorized to
receive the services is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
(5)  It is an affirmative defense to Subsections (1) and (2) that a person
obtained access or attempted to obtain access in response to, and for the
purpose of protecting against or investigating, a prior attempted or
successful breach of security of a computer, computer network, computer
property, computer system whose security the person is authorized or entitled
to protect, and the access attempted or obtained was no greater than
reasonably necessary for that purpose.
